Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 40. Shelter Cabins and Comfort Stations.

Sec. 18.40.010.
Shelter cabins and comfort stations on airports.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may erect and maintain shelter cabins and comfort stations for the accommodation of travelers on the airports throughout the state where the facilities are required and necessary out of funds appropriated for the construction and maintenance of roads and aviation fields. Each shelter cabin or comfort station shall contain a suitable stove and other facilities considered necessary by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

History.

(§ 40-10-1 ACLA 1949; am § 9 art VII title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 18.40.020.
Shelter cabins on roads and trails.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may erect and maintain cabins for the accommodation of travelers and shelter for dog teams and horses at the places along traveled roads and trails considered necessary by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the safety of the traveling public. Each cabin shall contain a suitable stove.
The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall place in conspicuous places on roads and trails leading to or from the cabins sign boards advising travelers of the direction and distance to the cabin.

History.

(§ 40-10-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 18.40.030.
Inspection of cabins.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall inspect or cause to be inspected all the cabins erected under this chapter at least once a year.

History.

(§ 40-10-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 18.40.040.
Cabins and furnishings property of state.

The cabins, comfort stations, stoves, and other furnishings provided for in this chapter are the property of the state.

History.

(§§ 40-10-2, 40-10-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 18.40.050.
Prohibited acts and penalties.

A person who wilfully removes, destroys, or defaces a cabin or part of a cabin, or stove or other furnishing, or who occupies a cabin for a length of time other than that necessary and incident to ordinary travel is guilty of violation of this chapter, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500, or by imprisonment in a jail for not less than three months nor more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§§ 40-10-2, 40-10-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 18.40.060.
Exception.

Nothing in this chapter prevents the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities from authorizing responsible persons in writing to occupy permanently in the capacity of caretakers or roadhouse keepers shelters with adequate accommodations in order to improve the accommodations for the traveling public.

History.

(§ 40-10-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 18.40.070.
Damages for destruction of or injury to shelter cabins.

A person who violates AS

18.40.050

is liable in damages for injury sustained by another as a result of the wilful destruction of or injury to a shelter cabin or its contents.

History.

(§ 40-10-6 ACLA 1949)